ext/spell/lv_LV.aff
SFX n Y 13
SFX n   s     is   [s]
SFX n   s     u    [^dlntsvz]s
SFX n   ds    žu   [d]s
SFX n   ls    ļu   [l]s
SFX n   ns    ņu   [^s]ns
SFX n   sns   šņu  [s]ns
SFX n   s     ju   [v]s
SFX n   zs    žu   [z]s
SFX n   s     īm   [s]
SFX n   s     īs   [s]
SFX n   s     u    [s]s
SFX n   ts    šu   [^āuūrs]ts
SFX n   ts    tu   [āuūrs]ts

SFX o Y 40
SFX o  s     a       [s]
SFX o  s     ā       [s]
SFX o  s     i       [s]
SFX o  s     u       [s]
SFX o  s     am      [s]
SFX o  s     iem     [s]
SFX o  s     os      [s]
SFX o  s     us      [s]
SFX o  s     o       [s]
SFX o  s     ai      [s]
SFX o  s     as      [s]
SFX o  s     ās      [s]
SFX o  s     ām      [s]
SFX o  s     ie      [s]
SFX o  s     ais     [s]
SFX o  s     ajam    [s]
SFX o  s     ajā     [s]
SFX o  s     ajai    [s]
SFX o  s     ajiem   [s]
SFX o  s     ajos    [s]
SFX o  s     ajām    [s]
SFX o  s     ajās    [s]
SFX o  š     a       [š]
SFX o  š     am      [š]
SFX o  š     ā       [š]
SFX o  š     u       [š]
SFX o  š     o       [š]
SFX o  š     ai      [š]
SFX o  š     as      [š]
SFX o  š     ās      [š]
SFX o  š     ām      [š]
SFX o  š     ie      [š]
SFX o  š     ais     [š]
SFX o  š     ajam    [š]
SFX o  š     ajā     [š]
SFX o  š     ajai    [š]
SFX o  š     ajiem   [š]
SFX o  š     ajos    [š]
SFX o  š     ajām    [š]
SFX o  š     ajās    [š]

SFX Y Y 28
SFX Y  s     āk      [s]
SFX Y  s     āks     [s]
SFX Y  s     āka     [s]
SFX Y  s     ākas    [s]
SFX Y  s     ākam    [s]
SFX Y  s     ākai    [s]
SFX Y  s     āku     [s]
SFX Y  s     ākā     [s]
SFX Y  s     āki     [s]
SFX Y  s     ākiem   [s]
SFX Y  s     ākām    [s]
SFX Y  s     ākus    [s]
SFX Y  s     ākos    [s]
SFX Y  s     ākās    [s]
SFX Y  š     āk      [š]
SFX Y  š     āks     [š]
SFX Y  š     āka     [š]
SFX Y  š     ākas    [š]
SFX Y  š     ākam    [š]
SFX Y  š     ākai    [š]
SFX Y  š     āku     [š]
SFX Y  š     ākā     [š]
SFX Y  š     āki     [š]
SFX Y  š     ākiem   [š]
SFX Y  š     ākām    [š]
SFX Y  š     ākus    [š]
SFX Y  š     ākos    [š]
SFX Y  š     ākās    [š]

SFX a Y 20
SFX a  s     ākais   [s]
SFX a  s     ākajam  [s]
SFX a  s     ākajai  [s]
SFX a  s     āko     [s]
SFX a  s     ākajā   [s]
SFX a  s     ākie    [s]
SFX a  s     ākajiem [s]
SFX a  s     ākajām  [s]
SFX a  s     ākajos  [s]
SFX a  s     ākajās  [s]
SFX a  š     ākais   [š]
SFX a  š     ākajam  [š]
SFX a  š     ākajai  [š]
SFX a  š     āko     [š]
SFX a  š     ākajā   [š]
SFX a  š     ākie    [š]
SFX a  š     ākajiem [š]
SFX a  š     ākajām  [š]
SFX a  š     ākajos  [š]
SFX a  š     ākajās  [š]

SFX y Y 13
SFX y  ais   0       [a]is
SFX y  ais   ā       [a]is
SFX y  ais   ās      [a]is
SFX y  is    jam     [a]is
SFX y  is    jai     [a]is
SFX y  ais   o       [a]is
SFX y  is    jā      [a]is
SFX y  ais   ie      [a]is
SFX y  is    jiem    [a]is
SFX y  is    jām     [a]is
SFX y  ais   os      [a]is
SFX y  is    jos     [a]is
SFX y  is    jās     [a]is

SFX q Y 45
SFX q   i       u     [i]
SFX q   i       as    [i]
SFX q   i       iem   [i]
SFX q   i       ām    [i]
SFX q   i       ās    [i]
SFX q   i       os    [i]
SFX q   i       us    [i]
SFX q   ais     ā     [a]is
SFX q   ais     o     [a]is
SFX q   ais     ās    [a]is
SFX q   ais     os    [a]is
SFX q   ais     ie    [a]is
SFX q   is      jam   [a]is
SFX q   is      jā    [a]is
SFX q   is      jai   [a]is
SFX q   is      jiem  [a]is
SFX q   is      jos   [a]is
SFX q   is      jām   [a]is
SFX q   is      jās   [a]is
SFX q   0       ais   [t]
SFX q   0       ā     [t]        
SFX q   0       o     [t]
SFX q   0       ās    [t]
SFX q   0       os    [t]
SFX q   0       ie    [t]
SFX q   0       ajam  [t]
SFX q   0       ajā   [t]
SFX q   0       ajai  [t]
SFX q   0       ajiem [t]
SFX q   0       ajos  [t]
SFX q   0       ajām  [t]
SFX q   0       ajās  [t]
SFX q   š       šais  [š]
SFX q   0       ā     [š]        
SFX q   0       o     [š]
SFX q   0       ās    [š]
SFX q   0       os    [š]
SFX q   0       ie    [š]
SFX q   0       ajam  [š]
SFX q   0       ajā   [š]
SFX q   0       ajai  [š]
SFX q   0       ajiem [š]
SFX q   0       ajos  [š]
SFX q   0       ajām  [š]
SFX q   0       ajās  [š]
