ext/spell/lv_LV.dic
administratīvs/oaYi
aizauss/nT
aizbrūkošs/o+i
aizcelt/a+BI[MJ5
aizgājušais/q+
aizkūrušais/+q
aizminams/Oo+i
aizpagājuši/q
aizrautīgs/oaYi
aizslaukt/%M+IB5Ja6
aizslējuši/+q
aiztekams/O+oi
aizšāvuši/+q
akmeņains/oaYi
alifātisks/oi
anarhistisks/oaYi
antarktisks/oia
antīks/oaYi
apakšģints/nT
apdzēruši/+q
apgarots/oaYi
apgūt/BI+^Zad[M7J4
apkodušais/+q
apkļāvušais/q+
aplienams/+ioO
apmāvušais/q+
apprecamāks/+oi
apriors/oaYi
aprējuši/+q
apskujams/oi+
apstūmuši/+q
aptēšams/o+Oi
apvilt/+aIBJ6M5
apvītuši/+q
apšķinams/+oiO
apņēmīgs/+oiYa
asinskārs/oaYi
asinspirts/Tn
astotdaļnots/nT
astoņsimttūkstoš/q
atbrienams/o+iO
atdūrušais/q+
atgārgt/+BI%6aJM5
atkožošs/+oi
atkrituši/+q
atlētisks/oaYi
atpletušais/+q
atributīvs/oaYi
atsaistītāks/+oi
atskāvušais/+q
attopams/Oio+
attūkt/Ia+Z7^MB4J
atvelt/+J[adq6MB
atšķīruši/+q
audiovizuāls/oi
auss/Tn
autobiogrāfisks/oaYi
aušīgs/oaYi
ballistisks/oi
balss/Tn
bargs/oaYi
baudkārīgs/oiaY
biežs/+Yaoi
bikonvekss/oaYi
bilancnespējīgs/oaYi
birzs/nT
bruņuts/Tn
brālīgs/oaYi
brēkulīgs/oaYi
brīvprātīgs/Yoi+a
brīvvalsts/nT
bākuguns/Tn
bārkšspurzivis/Tn
caurauklots/oaYi
caurdūrušais/+q
centrisks/o
cepeškrāsns/Tn
cerains/oaYi
cilts/Tn
cilvēcīgs/io+Ya
cērtams/i+aOo
cūcīgs/oaYi
dakts/nT
darbspējīgs/oaYi
daždažāds/oaYi
decimāls/oaYi
dekoratīvs/oaYi
deviņi/q
dialektisks/oaYi
dibinātājvalsts/Tn
diegveidīgs/oaYi
dievticīgs/oaYi
divkuprains/oaYi
divējāds/oaYi
divžuburains/oaYi
dižvalsts/Tn
donorvalsts/Tn
drastisks/oiYa
drošsirdīgs/oaYi
dvēseliskums/oi
dzeloņdrāts/Tn
dzeltenīgs/oaYi
dzelzs/nT
dzijuši/+q
dzēlīgs/oaYi
dūksts/nT
efektīgs/+oaYi
eiropisks/oaYi
ekskluzīvs/+oaYi
elektrokrāsns/nT
elektrozils/oaYi
enerģisks/oaYi
errīgs/oaYi
ezerpils/Tn
farmaceitisks/oaYi
fizikāls/oaYi
formāls/oia+Y
gadīgs/oaYi
galaktisks/oaYi
garastains/oaYi
globāls/oaYi
glāžains/oaYi
greizsirdīgs/oaYi
grotesks/oiYa
grunts/nT
grūts/oaYi
haizivs/nT
hektogrāfisks/oaYi
hipotekārs/oi
iebraukt/+%MIa6BJ5
iebļāvuši/q+
iecietīgs/ao+Yi
iedarvojamāks/o+i
ieguvējvalsts/Tn
iejāvušais/q+
iekult/+IJ[MdBa65
iekunkstams/oi+
iekurcuši/+q
iemetušais/q+
iepaliekams/iOo+
ieraugāms/a+
ierijuši/+q
ieslīps/oa
iespļāvuši/q+
ietinams/Ooi+a
ievērojamāks/o+Oi
ieziedušais/q+
igvāts/nT
ilgs/+oaYi
ilkņzivs/Tn
ilustratīvs/iYao
impozants/oaYi
iracionāls/oaYi
ireāls/oaYi
izbarams/Ooi+
izbūrušais/q+
izdevējvalsts/Tn
izgaismojamāks/+oi
izjutušais/q+
izjūgt/+aBd%MIJ[65
izkapts/Tn
izkāvušais/q+
izmantotāks/oi+
izmituši/+q
izpirkt/+IMaBdJ4[
izpucētāks/+oi
izrijuši/+q
izspiegotāks/+oi
izspļāvuši/q+
iztrīt/+aMIJ4
izvēršamāks/+io
izķēruši/+q
izšķērdīgs/aiYo
jaudīgs/oaYi
jaunatvērts/oi
jāvuši/+q
kadidātvalsts/Tn
kalnains/oaYi
kalsns/oaYi
kandidātvalsts/Tn
karaļvalsts/Tn
kaulzivs/Tn
kauzāls/oaYi
kašķīgs/oaYi
kinematogrāfisks/oaYi
klints/nT
kodolvalsts/nT
komisks/oaYi
komplekss/Oio
kompleksveidīgs/oaYi
korekts/a+oiY
korintisks/oaYi
kriminālvēsts/Tn
kroplīgs/oaYi
krustenisks/oaYi
krūts/Tn
kulinārs/OoaYi
kurcušais/q+
kustīgs/oi+Ya
kvēls/oaYi
kārts/nT
labvēlīgs/oi+aY
lakonisks/oaYi
lancetzivs/Tn
lecekts/nT
legatārs/oi
letarģisks/oaYi
liels/+OoaYi
lielvalsts/nT
lineārs/+oaYi
lokveidīgs/oaYi
lējušais/+q
lētticīgs/oaYi
līgans/oaYi
līgumslēdzējvalsts/nT
līksts/Tn
līkšņains/oaYi
mantrausīgs/oaYi
martenkrāsns/nT
mazgadīgs/oaYi
mazražīgs/oaYi
melanholisks/oaYi
melnplaukains/oaYi
melīgs/oaYi
mietpilsonisks/oaYi
miniatūrs/oaYi
monotons/oaYi
mufeļkrāsns/nT
multipls/o
mēleszivs/Tn
mēlnesīgs/oaYi
mīkstulīgs/oaYi
nakts/nT
našķīgs/oaYi
nerimtīgs/oaYi
nesušais/q
nihilistisks/oaYi
nobrēkt/J+aBd%M[I65
nogrāvušais/q+
nokrimtuši/+q
nokāšams/oOi+
nolēmušais/q+
norietais/q+
nosmulētāks/o+i
nospiegt/%+dIJ[6aM5B
nosprauduši/+q
nots/Tn
novēmušais/q+
nošķīruši/+q
nošņakstams/+io
nīts/Tn
objektīvs/OioYa
olekts/Tn
opozicionārs/oaYi
pabāls/oaYi
pacietušais/q+
padziedams/+oiO
pagājuši/+q
pakalnains/oaYi
pakliedzošs/oaYi
pakurcuši/+q
palts/Tn
pamelšošs/o+i
pamijušais/q+
panikns/oaYi
paplakt/+aBIJM4
partnervalsts/Tn
parāvuši/q+
pasauss/oaYi
paskrienošs/+oi
paspiegt/B%+aI56JM
paspļāvuši/+q
patukls/oaYi
pavalsts/Tn
pazelt/+Ia6MBJ5
pazems/oaYi
pazīdušais/q+
paštaisns/oaYi
paņēmušais/+q
pieaužošs/o+i
piebalss/Tn
piecpadsmit/q
pieglaimīgs/oaYi
piejāvuši/q+
piekāvušais/q+
piemirsušais/q+
piemīcošs/+oi
piemīlīgs/iYo+a
pierijušais/q+
piespraudušais/+q
pieticīgs/+oiaY
pietvēruši/+q
pievijamāks/+oi
piešķīstais/+q
pils/nT
pinkuļains/oaYi
pirksts/Tn
pirtskrāsns/Tn
piņņains/oaYi
plēkšņains/oaYi
plūcamāks/o+iO
pretbalss/Tn
pretenciozs/+oaYi
prettiesisks/oiYa
priekšpils/Tn
provocējošāks/+oiO
pults/Tn
pulverveidīgs/oaYi
pusass/TniYoO
pusnots/Tn
puņķains/oaYi
pāraugt/[+haBI(}Jd84M
pārbūruši/q+
pārcilvēcisks/oaYi
pārjāvušais/+q
pārkurcušais/+q
pārmāvuši/+q
pārrokams/Ooi+
pārslējušais/+q
pārslīgt/I+JBZ4a^7M
pārsēstais/q+
pārģiduši/+q
pērkonīgs/oaYi
pērļains/oaYi
pļāvuši/q+
radikāls/oaYi
rakstāmpults/Tn
redakcionāls/oaYi
reģionāls/oaYi
reģistrētājvalsts/Tn
rietošs/+oi
riņķveidīgs/oaYi
rūsgans/oaYi
rūts/nT
sabūrušais/q+
saglaužošs/+io
sagrāvuši/+q
sakrituši/+q
salakt/Ia+d4BM[J
sametušais/+q
sanitārtehnisks/oi
saradušais/+q
sarkanbalts/oaYi
saskūt/+aM6BJI4
saspraudušais/+q
sasteidzamāks/i+o
savijuši/+q
sašvīkstams/oi+
sašķīrušais/+q
saņēmējvalsts/Tn
sažulgt/+M7aI^B4ZJ
sekundārs/oYia
senvalsts/Tn
sešdesmit/q
signāluguns/Tn
sinkopisks/oYia
skarains/oaYi
skaudīgs/oaYi
skrejuguns/Tn
skumīgs/oaYi
skāvušais/q+
smilts/Tn
smirdīgs/oaYi
socioloģisks/oaYi
spaļains/oaYi
sportisks/+Yaoi
starpniekvalsts/Tn
sterils/+Yaoi
stiegrains/oaYi
stroboskopisks/oi
sulains/oaYi
superlielvalsts/Tn
svētbirzs/Tn
svītrots/Yaio+
sāpīgs/iYo+a
sēdušais/q+
taisnstūrains/oaYi
taktisks/oi+aY
takts/Tn
teritoriāls/oaYi
tiesībspējīgs/oaYi
tinteszivs/Tn
transseksuāls/oi
trauksmains/oaYi
trīsgadīgs/oaYi
tuksnesīgs/oaYi
tunzivs/Tn
tīšs/+oaYi
uguns/nT
ultrareakcionārs/oi
uroloģisks/oaYi
uzacs/nT
uzgājušais/q+
uzmāvušais/q+
uzpošošs/+oi
uzsūkt/+[IJa%dBM56
uztvēruši/+q
uzčiepstams/+oi
uzņēmīgs/o+iYa
vakarnakts/Tn
valsts/Tn
vants/nT
vasaļvalsts/nT
veikalniecisks/oaYi
veikls/+Yaoi
viegls/oaYi
vienmulīgs/oaYi
vingrs/oaYi
visaforistiskākais/y
visalainākais/y
visapaļīgākais/y
visaritmētiskākais/y
visatkarpainākais/y
visaugstražīgākais/y
visbakurētainākais/y
visbezpalīdzīgākais/y
visbordosarkanākais/y
visbāziskākais/y
visciniskākais/y
visdaudznozīmīgākais/y
visderīgākais/y
visdivcollīgākais/y
visdrausmākais/y
visdziļākais/y
visekspansīvākais/y
viseventuālākais/y
visfrāžainākais/y
visgaršīgākais/y
visgotiskākais/y
visgrūtākais/y
vishronometriskākais/y
visiepelēkākais/y
visilggadējākais/y
visinternacionālākais/y
visizreklamētākais/y
visjuteklīgākais/y
viskarstasinīgākais/y
visklīrīgākais/y
viskonkurētspējīgākais/y
viskraupjainākais/y
viskundziskākais/y
vislabestīgākais/y
vislegālākais/y
visliktenīgākais/y
vislīdzvainīgākais/y
vismazasinīgākais/y
vismehāniskākais/y
visminerālākais/y
vismutiskākais/y
vismīļākais/y
visneamorālākais/y
visneatsaucīgākais/y
visnecaurākais/y
visnedzestrākais/y
visnegardākais/y
visneietiepīgākais/y
visnejauktākais/y
visnekonvencionālākais/y
visnelineārākais/y
visnemonolītākais/y
visneomulīgākais/y
visnepateicīgākais/y
visnepieejamākais/y
visneprecīzākais/y
visneredzīgākais/y
visnesavaldīgākais/y
visnesmagākais/y
visnesvešākais/y
visnetumšākais/y
visnevienlaicīgākais/y
visneķīmiskākais/y
visnomaļākais/y
visolimpiskākais/y
vispadegošākais/y
vispanesīgākais/y
vispatriarhālākais/y
vispiectonnīgākais/y
visplatoniskākais/y
visprimārākais/y
vispārdegošākais/y
visrasiskākais/y
visrudākais/y
vissarkanākais/y
vissinkopiskākais/y
vissmeldzīgākais/y
visspēcīgs/oaYi
vissteidzīgākais/y
vissājākais/y
visticīgākais/y
vistvaikveidīgākais/y
visvaldītkārākais/y
visvilnainākais/y
viszobgalīgākais/y
visīpatnējākais/y
visžilbinošākais/y
vāts/nT
vēdinātāks/+oi
vēlīgs/iYoa
ziedains/oaYi
zils/oaYi
zivs/nT
zīduši/+q
ārprātīgs/oiaY
ārvalsts/Tn
ēdams/+aiYoO
četrbalsīgs/oaYi
čulgains/oaYi
īstens/oaYi
šalts/Tn
šaurlapains/oaYi
šaurs/oaYi
šķiedrains/oaYi
žēls/oaYi
